Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE I. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 9035. CROCKETT COUNTY WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT NO. 1

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9035.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the Crockett County Water Control and Improvement District No. 1.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 62 (H.B. 1944), Sec. 1, eff. May 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 9035.051. ELECTION OF DIRECTORS. (a) Notwithstanding Section 49.103(b), Water Code, on the uniform election date in November of each even-numbered year, the district shall hold an election to elect the appropriate number of directors to the board.

(b) The election may be held at any location that is in the boundaries of:

(1) the district; and

(2) Crockett County.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 62 (H.B. 1944), Sec. 1, eff. May 17, 2011.